Wisconsin, session 2025, SB439.
do enact as follows:SB439,13Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.SB439,1,44(1) Village of Oregon and towns of Oregon and Rutland levy limits.SB439,2,11(a) In this subsection: SB439,2,221. “Covered municipality” means all of the following:SB439,2,33a. The village of Oregon.SB439,2,44b. The town of Oregon in Dane County.SB439,2,55c. The town of Rutland in Dane County.SB439,2,762. “Joint emergency medical services district” has the meaning given in s. 766.0602 (1) (ak).SB439,2,883. “Joint fire department” has the meaning given in s. 66.0602 (1) (am).SB439,2,139(b) Notwithstanding s. 66.0602 (2) and (3) (h), for the levy imposed in 10December 2025, the base amount to which the levy increase limit under s. 66.0602 11(2) applies for a covered municipality is the actual levy, as determined and modified 12under s. 66.0602 (2), of the covered municipality that was imposed in December 132024.SB439,2,2114(c) Regardless of whether those charges or costs qualify for the exception 15under s. 66.0602 (3) (h) or whether those charges or costs may appropriately be 16included in the base amount for the December 2025 levy under the standards 17provided under s. 66.0602 (2), the department of revenue may not reduce the base 18amount established under par. (b) by any amounts levied by a covered municipality 19in December 2024 to pay for charges assessed by or costs associated with a joint fire 20department or joint emergency medical services district in which the covered 21municipality participates.SB439,3,222(d) Notwithstanding s. 66.0602 (2m) (a), for the December 2025 levy, the levy 23limit of a covered municipality shall not be reduced from the amount that the 24covered municipality levied in December 2024 for the payment of general obligation 1debt service associated with a joint fire department or joint emergency medical 2services district in which the covered municipality participates.SB439,3,43(e) This subsection does not affect the application of s. 66.0602 (3) (h) to the 4December 2025 levy.SB439,3,55